Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 93.
[AMENDMENT OF INITIATIVE AND REFERENDUM PETITIONS] (CONST., ART. 5, § 1, AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 1, and is incorporated within that section. The amendment was proposed by S.J.R. 16 during the 2013 Regular Session and adopted at the 2014 general election by a vote of 425,709 for and 372,784 against. The amendment was effective thirty days after the election pursuant to § 7-9-119.

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.